Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER 8

HOLIDAYS
AND PERIODS OF RECOGNITION AND OBSERVANCE

Section

8-1 Holidays designated

8-1.5 Discoverers' Day

8-2 Observance of holidays falling on Sundays
and Saturdays

8-3 Banking holidays

8-3.4 Civil liberties and the Constitution Day

8-3.6 Gold Star Family Day

8-3.5 Patriot Day

8-4 Buddha Day

8-4.5 Baha‘i New Year's Day

8-4.6 Asian Lunar New Year Commemoration Week

8-5 King Kamehameha celebration commission

8-5.5 Queen Lili‘uokalani Day

8-6 Repealed

8-7 Arbor Day

8-8 Saint Damien de Veuster Day

8-8.2 Saint Marianne Cope Day

8-9 Respect for Our Elders Day

8-10 Bodhi Day

8-11 Children and Youth Day and Month

8-12 World Ocean Day

8-13 Lei Day

8-14 Financial Literacy Month

8-15 Kupuna Recognition Day

8-16 Peace Day

8-16.2 Mohandas Karamchand Gandhi Day

8-17 Caregiver Recognition Day

8-18 Filipino-American History Month

8-18.5 Sakada Day

8-19 Makahiki Commemoration Day

8-20 Language Access Month

8-21 Domestic Violence Awareness Month

8-22 Kalo Appreciation Month

8-23 Homelessness Awareness Month

8-24 ‘Ōlelo Hawai‘i Month

8-25 Human Trafficking Awareness Month

8-28 Outdoor Heritage Month

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2015, c 35, §1.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next